North Carolina, session 2025, HB680.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Statutes are amended by adding a new Chapter to read:
"Chapter 18D.
"Regulation of Hemp-Derived Consumable Products.
"Article 1.
"Definitions and Authority.
"§ 18D-100. Definitions.
Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) ALE Division. – As defined in G.S. 18B-101.
*H680-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Commission. – As defined in G.S. 18B-101.
(3) Consumer. – An individual who purchases, receives, or possesses
hemp-derived consumable products for personal consumption and not for
resale.
(4) Delivery sale. – A sale of hemp-derived consumable products to a consumer
in this State in which either of the following applies:
a. The consumer submits the order for the sale by telephone, mail, the
internet or other online service or application, or when the seller is
otherwise not in the physical presence of the consumer when the
consumer submits the order.
b. The hemp-derived consumable products are delivered via mail or a
delivery service.
(5) Delivery seller. – A person located within or outside this State who makes a
delivery sale.
(6) Delivery seller permit. – A permit issued to a delivery seller pursuant to this
Chapter.
(7) Delivery service. – A person engaged in the commercial delivery of letters,
packages, or other containers.
(8) Distribute. – Sell, furnish, give, or provide hemp-derived consumable
products to the ultimate consumer.
(9) Hemp. – As defined in G.S. 90-87.
(10) Hemp-derived cannabinoid. – Any phytocannabinoid found in hemp,
including delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9 THC), tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid (THCA), cannabidiol (CBD), cannabidiolic acid (CBDA), cannabinol
(CBN), cannabigerol (CBG), cannabichromene (CBC), cannabicyclol (CBL),
cannabivarin (CBV), tetrahydrocannabivarin (THCV), cannabidivarin
(CBDV), cannabicitran (CBT), delta-7 tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-7 THC),
delta-8 tetrahydrocannibinol (delta-8 THC), or delta-10 tetrahydrocannibinol
(delta-10 THC). This term also includes any artificially produced cannabinoid
derived from hemp and contained in a hemp-derived consumable product.
(11) Hemp-derived consumable product. – A hemp product that is a finished good
intended for human ingestion or inhalation that contains a delta-9 THC
concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry
weight basis, but may contain concentrations of other hemp-derived
cannabinoids, in excess of that amount. This term does not include hemp
products intended for topical application or seeds or seed-derived ingredients
that are generally recognized as safe by the United States Food and Drug
Administration (FDA).
(12) Hemp-derived consumable product retail sales law. – Any statute or statutes
in this Chapter and the rules issued by the Commission under the authority of
this Chapter.
(13) Hemp product. – As defined in G.S. 90-87.
(14) Ingestion. – The process of consuming hemp through the mouth, by
swallowing into the gastrointestinal system or through tissue absorption.
(15) Inhalation. – The process of consuming hemp into the respiratory system
through the mouth or nasal passages.
(16) Packaging. – The individual packet, can, box, or other container used to
contain and to convey hemp-derived consumable products to the consumer.
(17) Permit. – A permit issued pursuant to this Chapter, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
Page 2 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(18) Person. – An individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited
liability company, other organization or group, or other combination of
individuals acting as a unit.
(19) Premises. – A fixed permanent establishment, including all areas inside or
outside the licensed establishment, where the permittee has control through a
lease, deed, or other legal process.
(20) Proof of age. – A drivers license, a special identification card issued under
G.S. 20-37.7 or issued by the state agency of any other state authorized to
issue similar official state special identification cards for that state, a military
identification card, or a passport showing the purchaser's age to be at least the
required age for purchase and bearing a physical description of the person
named on the card reasonably describing the purchaser.
(21) Retail dealer. – A person who sells a hemp-derived consumable product to the
ultimate consumer of the product, including a delivery seller.
(22) Retail seller. – A retail dealer who is not a delivery seller.
(23) Retail seller permit. – A permit issued to a retail seller pursuant to this Chapter.
(24) Sale. – As defined in G.S. 105-113.4.
(25) Sample. – A hemp-derived consumable product distributed to members of the
general public at no cost for the purpose of promoting the product.
"§ 18D-101. Powers and duties of the Commission.
(a) The Commission shall have the authority to do all of the following:
(1) Administer the hemp-derived consumable product retail sales laws pursuant
to this Chapter.
(2) Provide for enforcement of the hemp-derived consumable product retail sales
laws pursuant to this Chapter, in conjunction with the ALE Division.
(3) Issue permits and impose sanctions against permittees in accordance with this
Chapter.
(b) The Commission shall have all other powers which may be reasonably implied from
the granting of the express powers listed in subsection (a) of this section, or which may be
incidental to, or convenient for, performing the duties given to the Commission.
"§ 18D-102. Inspection of licensed premises.
(a) To procure evidence of violations of the hemp-derived consumable product retail
sales law, alcohol law enforcement agents and employees of the Commission shall have authority
to investigate the operation of each licensed premises for which a permit has been issued, to make
inspections that include viewing the entire premises, and to examine the books and records of the
permittee. The inspection authorized by this section may be made at any time it reasonably
appears that someone is on the premises.
(b) Refusal by a permittee or by any employee of a permittee to allow officers or
employees of the Commission to enter the premises to make an inspection authorized by
subsection (a) of this section shall be cause for revocation, suspension, or other action against the
permit or the permittee as provided in G.S. 18D-103. It shall be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any
person to resist or obstruct an officer attempting to make a lawful inspection under this section.
"§ 18D-103. Administrative penalties.
(a) For any violation of the hemp-derived consumable product retail sales laws, the
Commission may take any of the following actions against a permittee:
(1) Suspend the permittee's permit for a specified period of time not longer than
three years.
(2) Revoke the permittee's permit.
(3) Fine the permittee up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) for the first violation,
up to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for the second violation within
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
three years, and up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the third violation
within three years of the first violation.
(4) Suspend the permittee's permit under subdivision (1) of this subsection and
impose a fine under subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(b) In any case in which the Commission is entitled to suspend or revoke a permit, the
Commission may accept from the permittee an offer in compromise to pay a penalty of not more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The Commission may either accept a compromise or revoke
a permit, but not both. The Commission may accept a compromise and suspend the permit in the
same case.
(c) The clear proceeds of fines and penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be
remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(d) Suspension or revocation of a permit is grounds for suspension or revocation of any
related State or local revenue license.
(e) Unless some other disposition is ordered by the Commission for a hemp-derived
consumable product retail sales law violation, revocation or suspension of a permit under
subsection (a) of this section does not include automatic revocation or suspension, respectively,
of any ABC permit held by the same permittee for the same establishment.
"§ 18D-104. Rules.
The Commission shall have authority to adopt, amend, and repeal rules to carry out the
provisions of this Chapter. Those rules shall become effective when adopted and filed pursuant
to the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
"§ 18D-105. Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act.
(a) A permit is a "license" within the meaning of G.S. 150B-2 and, except for a
confirmation pursuant to G.S. 18D-300(a)(7), a Commission action on issuance, suspension, or
revocation of a permit, other than a temporary permit issued under G.S. 18D-304, is a "contested
case" subject to the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, except as provided in
this section.
(b) Hearings on permits shall be held within 100 miles, as best can be determined by the
Commission, of the county seat of the county in which the licensed business or proposed business
is located. The hearing may be held, however, at any place upon agreement of the Commission
and all other parties.
(c) In making a final decision in a contested case in which an issue is whether to deny an
application for a permit because the applicant is unsuitable, the Commission may hear evidence
of acts that occurred after the date the contested case hearing was held if the evidence is
admissible under G.S. 150B-29(a). New evidence heard under this subsection is not grounds for
reversal or remand under G.S. 150B-51(a).
"Article 2.
"Sales.
"§ 18D-200. Permit required.
(a) It is unlawful to sell a hemp-derived consumable product to a consumer in this State
without a permit issued by the Commission in accordance with this Chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, no permit issued pursuant to this
Chapter shall be required by a delivery service making deliveries on behalf of another person
holding a permit issued pursuant to this Chapter.
"§ 18D-201. Disposition of seized hemp-derived consumable products.
(a) A law enforcement officer who seizes hemp-derived consumable products as
evidence of a hemp-derived consumable product retail sales law violation shall provide for the
storage of those hemp-derived consumable products until the commencement of the trial or
administrative hearing relating to the violation, unless some other disposition is authorized under
this section.
Page 4 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) After giving notice to each defendant, to any other known owner, and to the
Commission, a judge may order any of the following dispositions of the hemp-derived
consumable products seized as evidence of a hemp-derived consumable product retail sales law
violation:
(1) The destruction of any hemp-derived consumable products except that amount
needed for evidence at trial.
(2) The sale of any hemp-derived consumable products other than any
hemp-derived consumable products needed for evidence at trial, if the trial is
likely to be delayed for more than 90 days, or if the quantity or nature of the
hemp-derived consumable products is such that storage is impractical or
unduly expensive.
(3) The destruction of the hemp-derived consumable products if storage or sale is
not practical.
(4) Continued storage of the hemp-derived consumable products.
(c) After the criminal charge is resolved, a judge may order any of the following
dispositions of the seized hemp-derived consumable products:
(1) If the owner or possessor of the hemp-derived consumable products is found
guilty of a criminal charge relating to those hemp-derived consumable
products, the judge may order the sale or destruction of any hemp-derived
consumable products that were held until trial.
(2) If the owner or possessor of the hemp-derived consumable products is found
not guilty, or if charges are dismissed or otherwise resolved in favor of the
owner or possessor, the judge shall order the hemp-derived consumable
products returned to that owner or possessor, except as provided in
subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(3) If the owner or possessor of the hemp-derived consumable products is found
not guilty, or if charges are otherwise resolved in favor of the owner or
possessor, but possession of the hemp-derived consumable products by that
owner or possessor would be unlawful, the judge shall order the hemp-derived
consumable products either sold or destroyed.
(4) If ownership of the hemp-derived consumable products remains uncertain
after trial or after the charges have been dismissed, the judge may order the
hemp-derived consumable products held for a specified time, until ownership
of the hemp-derived consumable products can be determined.
(d) If hemp-derived consumable products used as evidence in a criminal proceeding are
also needed as evidence at an administrative hearing, a judge shall not order any of the
dispositions set out in subsection (c) of this section but shall order the hemp-derived consumable
products held for the administrative hearing and for a determination of final disposition by the
Commission. The Commission may, before or after an administrative hearing, order any of the
dispositions authorized under subsections (b) and (c) of this section. If no related criminal
proceeding has commenced, the Commission shall not order destruction of the hemp-derived
consumable products until notice has been given to the district attorney for the district where the
hemp-derived consumable products were seized or any violation of hemp-derived consumable
product retail sales laws related to the seizure of the hemp-derived consumable products is likely
to be prosecuted.
(e) The sale of hemp-derived consumable products shall be by public auction to a
hemp-derived consumable products manufacturer, a hemp-derived consumable products
wholesaler, or a person holding a permit issued under this Chapter.
(f) An agency selling hemp-derived consumable products seized under the provisions of
this Chapter shall keep the proceeds in a separate account until some other disposition is ordered
by a judge or the Commission. In a criminal proceeding, if the owner or possessor of the
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
hemp-derived consumable products is found guilty of a violation relating to seizure of the
hemp-derived consumable products, if the owner or possessor is found not guilty or the charge
is dismissed or otherwise resolved in favor of the owner or possessor, but the possession of the
hemp-derived consumable products by that owner or possessor would be unlawful, or if the
ownership of the hemp-derived consumable products cannot be determined, the proceeds from
the sale of those hemp-derived consumable products shall be paid to the school fund of the county
in which the hemp-derived consumable products were seized. If the owner or possessor of the
hemp-derived consumable products seized for violation of the hemp-derived consumable product
retail sales laws is found not guilty of criminal charges relating to the seizure of those
hemp-derived consumable products or the charge is dismissed or otherwise resolved in favor of
the owner or possessor, and if possession of the hemp-derived consumable products by that
owner or possessor was lawful when the hemp-derived consumable products were seized, the
proceeds from the sale of those hemp-derived consumable products shall be paid to the owner or
possessor. The agency making the sale may deduct and retain from the amount to be placed in
the county school fund the costs of storing the seized hemp-derived consumable products and of
conducting the sale but may not deduct those costs from the amount to be turned over to an owner
or possessor of the hemp-derived consumable products.
(g) Any person who claims any of the following resulting from the seizure of
hemp-derived consumable products may bring an action in the superior court of the county in
which the hemp-derived consumable products were seized:
(1) To be the owner of hemp-derived consumable products that are wrongfully
held.
(2) To be the owner of hemp-derived consumable products that are needed as
evidence in another proceeding.
(3) To be entitled to proceeds from a sale of the hemp-derived consumable
products.
(4) To be entitled to restitution for hemp-derived consumable products
wrongfully destroyed.
"§ 18D-202. Forfeiture.
(a) Hemp-derived consumable products possessed or sold in violation of the
hemp-derived consumable product retail sales laws shall be subject to forfeiture.
(b) Hemp-derived consumable products which may be possessed lawfully shall not be
subject to forfeiture when they were used unlawfully by someone other than the owner of the
hemp-derived consumable products and the owner did not consent to the unlawful use.
(c) If hemp-derived consumable products subject to forfeiture have not already been
seized as part of an arrest or search, a law enforcement officer may apply to a judge for an order
authorizing seizure of that hemp-derived consumable product. An order for seizure may be issued
only after criminal process has been issued for hemp-derived consumable product retail sales law
violation in connection with that hemp-derived consumable product. The order shall describe the
hemp-derived consumable product to be seized and shall state the facts establishing probable
cause to believe that the hemp-derived consumable product is subject to forfeiture.
(d) A law enforcement officer seizing the hemp-derived consumable product subject to
forfeiture shall provide for its safe storage until trial.
(e) The presiding judge in a criminal proceeding for violation of hemp-derived
consumable product retail sales laws may take any of the following actions after resolution of a
charge against the owner or possessor of the hemp-derived consumable product subject to
forfeiture under this section:
(1) If the owner or possessor of the hemp-derived consumable product is found
guilty of a hemp-derived consumable product retail sales offense, the judge
may order the hemp-derived consumable product forfeited.
Page 6 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) If the owner or possessor of the hemp-derived consumable product is found
not guilty, or if the charge is dismissed or otherwise resolved in favor of the
owner or possessor, the judge shall order the hemp-derived consumable
product returned to the owner or possessor.
(3) If ownership of the hemp-derived consumable product remains uncertain after
trial, the judge may order the hemp-derived consumable product held for a
specified time to determine ownership. If the judge finds that ownership
cannot be determined with reasonable effort, the judge shall order the
hemp-derived consumable product forfeited.
(4) Regardless of the disposition of the charge, if the hemp-derived consumable
product is something that may not be possessed lawfully, the judge shall order
it forfeited.
(5) If the hemp-derived consumable product is also needed as evidence at an
administrative hearing, the judge shall provide that the order does not go into
effect until the Commission determines that the hemp-derived consumable
product is no longer needed for the administrative proceeding.
(f) A judge ordering forfeiture of the hemp-derived consumable product may order any
one of the following dispositions:
(1) Sale at public auction to a hemp-derived consumable products manufacturer,
a hemp-derived consumable products wholesaler, or a person holding a permit
issued under this Chapter.
(2) Destruction, if possession of the hemp-derived consumable product would be
unlawful or if sale or other disposition is not practical.
(g) If the forfeited hemp-derived consumable product is sold, the proceeds of that sale
shall be paid to the school fund of the county in which the hemp-derived consumable product
was seized, except as provided in subsection (h) of this section. Before placing the hemp-derived
consumable product proceeds in the school fund, the agency making the sale may deduct and
retain the costs of storing the hemp-derived consumable product and conducting the sale.
(h) At any time before forfeiture is ordered, an owner of the seized hemp-derived
consumable product or a holder of a security interest in the seized hemp-derived consumable
product, other than the defendant, may apply to protect the person's interest in the hemp-derived
consumable product. The application may be made to any judge who has jurisdiction to try the
offense with which the hemp-derived consumable product is associated. If the judge finds that
the hemp-derived consumable product owner or holder of a security interest did not consent to
the unlawful use of the hemp-derived consumable product, and that the hemp-derived
consumable product may be possessed lawfully by the owner or holder, the judge may order any
of the following:
(1) That the hemp-derived consumable product be returned to the owner, if it is
not needed as evidence at trial.
(2) That the hemp-derived consumable product be returned to the owner
following trial or other resolution of the case.
(3) That, if the hemp-derived consumable product is sold following trial, a
specified sum be paid from the proceeds of that sale to the holder of the
security interest.
(i) When the hemp-derived consumable product is seized for forfeiture but the owner is
unknown, the district attorney may seek forfeiture under this section by an action in rem against
the hemp-derived consumable product. If the owner is known and has been charged with an
offense but is unavailable for trial, the district attorney may seek forfeiture either by an action in
rem against the hemp-derived consumable product or by motion in the criminal action.
(j) Any owner of a hemp-derived consumable product seized for forfeiture may apply to
a judge to have the hemp-derived consumable product returned to him if no criminal charge has
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
been made in connection with that hemp-derived consumable product within a reasonable time
after seizure. The judge may not order the return of the hemp-derived consumable product if
possession by the owner would be unlawful.
"Article 3.
"Issuance of Permits.
"§ 18D-300. Qualifications for a permit.
(a) To be eligible to receive and to hold a permit under this Chapter, a person must satisfy
all of the following requirements:
(1) Be at least 21 years old.
(2) Be a resident of North Carolina, unless either of the following applies:
a. The person is an officer, director, or stockholder of a corporate
applicant or permittee and is not a manager or otherwise responsible
for the day-to-day operation of the business.
b. The person has executed a power of attorney designating a qualified
resident of this State to serve as attorney-in-fact for the purposes of
receiving service of process and managing the business for which
permits are sought.
(3) Not have been convicted of a felony within three years and, if convicted of a
felony before then, have had his or her citizenship restored.
(4) Not have been convicted of a hemp-derived consumable product retail sales
law within five years.
(5) Not have been convicted of a misdemeanor controlled substance offense
within five years.
(6) Not have had a permit issued under this Chapter revoked within five years,
except where the revocation was based solely on a permittee's failure to pay
the annual renewal fee required in G.S. 18D-302(d).
(7) Be current in filing all applicable tax returns to the State and in payment of all
taxes, interest, and penalties that are collectible under G.S. 105-241.22.
To avoid undue hardship, however, the Commission may decline to take action under
G.S. 18D-103 against a permittee who is in violation of subdivision (3), (4), or (5) of this
subsection.
(b) A person has been "convicted" for the purposes of subsection (a) of this section when
the person has been found guilty or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere and judgment
has been entered. A felony conviction in another jurisdiction disqualifies a person from being
eligible to receive or hold a permit under this Chapter if the conduct would also constitute a
felony in North Carolina. A conviction of a hemp-derived consumable product retail sales law or
misdemeanor drug offense in another jurisdiction disqualifies a person from being eligible to
receive or hold a permit under this Chapter if the conduct would constitute an offense in North
Carolina, unless the Commission determines that under North Carolina procedure judgment
would not have been entered under the same circumstances. Revocation of a permit in another
jurisdiction disqualifies a person if the conduct would be grounds for revocation of a permit under
this Chapter in North Carolina.
(c) For a permit to be issued to and held for a business, each of the following persons
associated with that business must qualify under subsection (a) of this section:
(1) The owner of a sole proprietorship.
(2) Each member of a firm, association, or general partnership.
(3) Each general partner in a limited partnership.
(4) Each manager and any member with a twenty-five percent (25%) or greater
interest in a limited liability company.
(5) Each officer, director, and owner of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the
stock of a corporation except that the requirement of subdivision (1) of
Page 8 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subsection (a) of this section does not apply to the officer, director, or
stockholder unless he or she is a manager or is otherwise responsible for the
day-to-day operation of the business.
(6) The manager of an establishment operated by a corporation.
(7) Any manager who has been empowered as attorney-in-fact for a nonresident
individual or partnership.
(8) Any manager or person otherwise responsible for the day-to-day operation of
the business, if none of the persons listed in subdivisions (1) through (7) of
this subsection are a manager or person otherwise responsible for the
day-to-day operation of the business.
(d) Upon request of the Commission, the Department of Revenue shall provide
information to the Commission to confirm a person's compliance with subdivision (7) of
subsection (a) of this section. If the Department of Revenue notifies the Commission that a person
is not in compliance, then the Commission may not issue or renew the person's permit until the
Commission receives notice from the Department of Revenue that the person is in compliance.
The requirement to pay all taxes, interest, and penalties may be satisfied by an operative
agreement under G.S. 105-237 covering any amounts that are collectible under G.S. 105-241.22.
Chapter 150B of the General Statutes does not apply to a Commission action on issuance,
suspension, or revocation of a permit under subdivision (7) of subsection (a) of this section.
"§ 18D-301. Issuance of permits.
(a) All permits shall be issued by the Commission.
(b) Before issuing a permit, the Commission shall be satisfied that the applicant is a
suitable person to hold a permit and that the location is a suitable place to hold the permit for
which the applicant has applied. Factors the Commission shall consider in determining whether
the applicant and the business location are suitable are all of the following:
(1) The reputation, character, and criminal record of the applicant.
(2) Any other evidence that would tend to show whether the applicant would
comply with the hemp-derived consumable product retail sales laws.
(3) Whether the operation of the retail seller permit applicant's business at that
location would be detrimental to the neighborhood, including evidence
admissible under G.S. 150B-29(a) of any of the following:
a. Past revocations, suspensions, and violations of ABC laws by prior
permittees related to or associated with the applicant, or a business
with which the applicant is associated, within the immediate preceding
12-month period at this location.
b. Evidence of illegal drug activity on or about the licensed premises.
c. Evidence of fighting, disorderly conduct, and other dangerous
activities on or about the licensed premises.
(c) The Commission shall have the sole power, in its discretion, to determine the
suitability and qualifications of an applicant for a permit. The Commission shall also have the
authority to determine the suitability of the location to which the permit may be issued.
"§ 18D-302. Application for permit; fees.
(a) An application for a permit shall be on a form prescribed by the Commission and shall
be notarized in accordance with Chapter 10B of the General Statutes. Each person required to
qualify under G.S. 18D-300(c) shall sign and swear to the application and submit a full set of
fingerprints with the application.
(b) Before issuing a new permit, the Commission, with the assistance of the ALE
Division, shall investigate the applicant and, for a retail seller permit, the premises for which the
permit is requested. An applicant shall cooperate fully with the investigation. The State Bureau
of Investigation may provide a criminal record check to the ALE Division for a person who has
applied for a permit through the Commission. The ALE Division shall provide to the State Bureau
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of Investigation, along with the request, the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional
information required by the State Bureau of Investigation, and a form signed by the applicant
consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other
identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The applicant's fingerprints
shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State's criminal history
record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The ALE Division and the
Commission shall keep all information pursuant to this subsection privileged, in accordance with
applicable State law and federal guidelines, and the information shall be confidential and shall
not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. The State Bureau of
Investigation may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks of criminal history
records authorized by this subsection.
(c) Knowingly making a false statement in an application for a permit shall be grounds
for denying, suspending, revoking, or taking other action against the permit as provided in
G.S. 18D-103 and shall also be unlawful.
(d) An application for a permit shall be accompanied by payment of two thousand dollars
($2,000) for each applicant's location or each delivery seller applicant's internet website offering
delivery in this State. However, a single entity with more than 25 locations, internet websites
offering delivery in this State, or a combination of the two shall not pay more than fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) and shall submit a list of all locations and all internet websites offering delivery
in this State to the Commission.
(e) The fee required by subsection (d) of this section shall not be refunded.
(f) All fees collected by the Commission under this Chapter shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for the General Fund.
"§ 18D-303. Duration of permit; renewal and transfer.
(a) Once issued, permits shall be valid for up to one year, from May 1 to April 30.
(b) Application for renewal of a permit shall be on a form provided by the Commission.
An application for renewal shall be accompanied by a renewal fee. The renewal fee shall be the
same amount as the application fee set in G.S. 18D-302. A renewal fee shall not be refundable.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Commission shall not revoke a
permit for failure to pay a renewal application fee until June 1 of each year. No later than five
business days after April 30 of each year, the Commission shall notify permittees who have not
paid any required renewal application fees as of April 30. The Commission shall charge a late
fee of twenty-five percent (25%) of the renewal application fee for a permit for which the renewal
application fee is submitted after April 30.
(d) Change in Ownership. –
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (2a) of this subsection, all permits
for an establishment shall automatically expire and shall be surrendered to the
Commission in any of the following circumstances:
a. Ownership of the establishment changes.
b. There is a change in the membership of the firm, association, or
partnership owning the establishment, involving the acquisition of a
twenty-five percent (25%) or greater share in the firm, association, or
partnership by someone who did not previously own a twenty-five
percent (25%) or greater share.
c. Twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the stock of the corporate
permittee owning the establishment is acquired by someone who did
not previously own twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the stock.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, any person who through
contract, lease, management agreement, or change of ownership or transfer of
business as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection becomes lawfully
Page 10 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
entitled to use and control of the premises of an establishment that holds
permits immediately prior to such change of ownership may continue to
operate the establishment, as successor to the prior permittee, to the same
extent as the predecessor permittee until the person receives a temporary or
new permit, subject to the following limitations:
a. The person shall provide written or electronic notice to the
Commission of the name of the non-permitted person, the name and
address of the permitted establishment, and the date of the change in
ownership. The person may not operate the establishment as provided
in this subdivision until the person has provided notice to the
Commission. The Commission shall not require any additional
documentation besides the written or electronic notice to satisfy this
requirement. The prior permittee shall not be liable for any acts or
omissions of the non-permitted person operating the establishment.
Any violations of the hemp-derived consumable product retail sales
law committed by the person or any actions taken by the Commission
to revoke or suspend the permit based on the acts or omissions of the
person operating the establishment shall not preclude the prior
permittee from receiving a permit for a different establishment.
b. The person shall submit a new permit application to the Commission
within 60 days after the change of ownership. If the person does not
apply for a new permit within 60 days, all permits for the establishment
shall automatically expire and shall be surrendered to the Commission.
c. The 60-day period to file a new permit application shall only be
allowed once per 24 months for each establishment that holds a permit,
unless the establishment requests and the Commission grants a waiver
of the 24-month requirement. The Commission shall grant a waiver of
the 24-month requirement if it determines that the public health,
safety, and welfare would not be harmed by granting the waiver.
d. This subdivision shall apply only to establishments that hold permits
that are in good standing and that have not been found responsible by
the Commission or a court of competent jurisdiction of a gambling,
assault, disorderly conduct, prostitution, or controlled substances
violation within 12 months prior to the date the non-permitted person
becomes entitled to use and control of the establishment.
e. The person shall be authorized to operate the establishment as
successor to the prior permittee to the same extent as the predecessor
permittee until the Commission either issues or denies the permit
application submitted pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this
subdivision.
(2a) The transfer by a person of any ownership interest to a revocable or
irrevocable trust established by the person shall not constitute a change in
ownership for purposes of subdivision (1) of this subsection if the person
transferring the ownership interest to the trust continues to operate the
establishment. If the person who transferred the ownership interest ceases to
operate the establishment following the transfer of the ownership interest to
the trust, this shall constitute a change in ownership for purposes of
subdivision (1) of this subsection. The trustee shall notify the Commission
within 30 days if the person who transferred the ownership interest ceases to
operate the establishment.
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) A corporation holding a permit for an establishment for which the manager is required
to qualify as an applicant under G.S. 18D-300(c) shall, within 30 days after employing a new
manager, submit to the Commission an application for substitution of a manager. The application
shall be signed by the new manager, shall be on a form provided by the Commission, and shall
be accompanied by a fee of ten dollars ($10.00). The fee shall not be refundable.
(f) A permit issued pursuant to this Chapter may not be transferred from one person to
another or from one location to another.
(g) The Commission may issue duplicate permits for an establishment when the existing
valid permits have been lost or damaged. The request for duplicate permits shall be on a form
provided by the Commission, certified by the permittee and the ALE Division, and accompanied
by a fee of ten dollars ($10.00).
(h) The Commission may issue new permits to a permittee upon application and payment
of a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each location when the permittee's name or name of the
business is changed.
"§ 18D-304. Miscellaneous provisions concerning permits.
(a) The following apply to a permit issued pursuant to this Chapter:
(1) A retail seller permit shall authorize the sale of hemp-derived consumable
products only in the physical presence of the consumer on the fixed premises
of the establishment located in the State and named in the permit. A retail
seller permit shall be issued to the owner of the business conducted on the
premises or to the management company employed to independently manage
and operate the business. The Commission may determine if a management
agreement delegates sufficient managerial control and independence to a
manager or management company to require a retail seller permit to be issued
to the manager.
(2) A delivery seller permit shall authorize a delivery sale only, originating either
inside or outside of the State. A delivery seller permit shall be issued to the
owner of the business or to the management company employed to
independently manage and operate the business. The Commission may
determine if a management agreement delegates sufficient managerial control
and independence to a manager or management company to require a delivery
seller permit to be issued to the manager.
(b) Each retail seller permit that is held by an establishment shall be posted in a prominent
place on the premises. Each delivery seller shall post its delivery seller permit number on any
advertisement, the internet, or other online service or application a customer may use to submit
an order and on all invoices or receipts for hemp-derived consumable products delivered by mail
or a delivery service.
(c) No permit shall be issued to a business on the campus or property of a public school,
college, or university.
(d) A permit shall automatically expire and shall be surrendered to the Commission if the
person to whom it is issued does not commence the activity authorized by the permit within six
months of the date the permit is effective. Before the expiration of the six-month period, the
Commission may waive this provision in individual cases for good cause.
(e) Upon issuing a permit, the Commission shall send notice of the issuance, with the
name and address of the permittee and the establishment, to all of the following:
(1) The Department of Revenue.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health,
Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services.
(3) The ALE Division.
"§ 18D-305. Temporary permits.
Page 12 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
When an application has been received in proper form, with the required application fee, the
Commission may issue a temporary permit for any of the activities for which permits are
authorized under this Chapter. A temporary permit may be revoked summarily by the
Commission without complying with the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
Revocation of a temporary permit or withdrawal by the Commission of a pending application by
a permittee possessing a temporary permit shall be effective upon service of the notice of
revocation or withdrawal upon the permittee at either the permittee's residence or the address
given for the business in the permit application or upon the expiration of five business days after
the notice of the revocation or withdrawal has been mailed to the permittee at either the
permittee's residence or the address given for the business in the permit application. No further
notice shall be required.
"§ 18D-306. Allow electronic submission of payments and forms.
(a) The Commission shall make all forms required by the Commission to apply for and
receive a permit available on the Commission's website, and the Commission shall, to the extent
practicable, allow for the electronic submission of these forms. Any form required by the
Commission to apply for and receive a permit that requires a signature may be submitted with an
electronic signature in accordance with Article 40 of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes and
notarized in accordance with Chapter 10B of the General Statutes.
(b) The Commission shall accept electronic payments for any fee required under this
Chapter to receive a permit. For purposes of this subsection, the term "electronic payment" means
payment by charge card, credit card, debit card, or by electronic funds transfer as defined in
G.S. 105-228.90.
(c) The Commission may charge a fee to be used to cover costs incurred by the
Commission in processing forms electronically and accepting payments electronically. The fee
authorized under this subsection may not exceed five dollars ($5.00).
"§ 18D-307. Permits issued pursuant to this Chapter and ABC permits.
(a) Applications for permits issued pursuant to this Chapter may be filed simultaneously
or in conjunction with applications for ABC permits under Chapter 18B of the General Statutes
and may be combined by the Commission in a single application.
(b) The Commission may use, rely upon, or incorporate by reference any information an
applicant for a permit under this Chapter has submitted in conjunction with an ABC permit issued
pursuant to Chapter 18B of the General Statutes.
"Article 4.
"Retail Activities.
"§ 18D-400. Responsibilities of permittee.
(a) For purposes of this Chapter, a retail seller permittee shall be responsible for the entire
premises for which the permit is issued. The permittee shall keep the premises clean, well-lighted,
and orderly.
(b) For purposes of this Chapter, a permittee shall be responsible for the actions of all
employees of the business for which the permit is issued.
(c) A permittee shall not knowingly employ in the sale or distribution of hemp-derived
consumable products any person who has been a past permit holder under this Chapter whose
permit had been revoked within the last 18 months and who had been the permit holder at the
location where the person would be employed.
(d) An employee or agent of a retail seller shall demand proof of age from a prospective
purchaser of hemp-derived consumable products before the hemp-derived consumable product
is released to the purchaser, if the person has reasonable grounds to believe that the prospective
purchaser is under 30 years of age.
(e) A delivery seller shall do both of the following:
(1) Perform an age verification through an independent, third-party age
verification service that compares information available from public records
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to the personal information entered by the individual during the ordering
process to establish that the individual ordering the hemp-derived consumable
products is 21 years of age or older.
(2) Use a method of mailing, shipping, or delivery that requires the signature of a
person at least 21 years of age before the hemp-derived consumable product
is released to the purchaser.
(f) Retail sellers of hemp-derived consumable products shall train their employees or
agents in the requirements of this Chapter, to include all of the following:
(1) Which products the retail dealer sells meet the definition of a hemp-derived
consumable product.
(2) The age requirements for purchasing hemp-derived consumable products.
(3) Acceptable forms of identification.
(4) Methods to detect fake, altered, and imposter forms of identification.
(5) Penalties for sales to underage persons.
(6) Methods of identifying potentially underage persons and to prevent underage
sales.
(g) Retail dealers shall prominently display to the ultimate consumer the following
statement: "N.C. LAW STRICTLY PROHIBITS THE PURCHASE OF HEMP-DERIVED
CONSUMABLE PRODUCTS BY PERSONS UNDER THE AGE OF 21. PROOF OF AGE
REQUIRED." as follows:
(1) Retail sellers shall prominently display this required statement near the point
of sale on a sign with letters at least 5/8 of an inch high.
(2) Delivery sellers shall prominently display this required statement on any
advertisement, the internet, or other online service or application a customer
may use to submit an order and on all invoices or receipts for hemp-derived
consumable products delivered by mail or a delivery service.
"§ 18D-401. Conduct on licensed premises.
(a) It shall be unlawful for a permittee or the permittee's agent or employee to knowingly
allow any of the following kinds of conduct to occur on the licensed premises:
(1) Any violation of this Chapter.
(2) Any fighting or other disorderly conduct that can be prevented without undue
danger to the permittee, the permittee's employees, or patrons.
(3) Any violation of the controlled substances, gambling, or prostitution statutes,
or any other unlawful acts.
(b) It shall be unlawful for a permittee to fail to superintend in person or through a
manager the business for which a permit is issued.
"§ 18D-402. Miscellaneous hemp-derived consumable product sales provisions.
(a) A permittee shall not sell hemp-derived consumable products through displays
accessible to the public without the assistance of a permittee's employee or agent other than in
an establishment open only to persons 21 years of age and older.
(b) It shall be unlawful for any person to do any of the following:
(1) Produce or possess any false or facsimile permit, or for a permittee to display
any false or facsimile permit on the person's licensed premises.
(2) Refuse to surrender any permit to the Commission upon lawful demand of the
Commission or its agents.
(3) Offer hemp-derived consumable products for sale in a vending machine.
(4) Distribute hemp-derived consumable products not approved or authorized by
the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(5) Sell hemp-derived consumable products other than in the manufacturer's or
importer's original, sealed, and unopened packaging that complies with all
federal labeling requirements.
Page 14 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Distribute or cause to be distributed samples of hemp-derived consumable
products.
"Article 5.
"Hemp-Derived Consumable Product Sales to Underage Persons.
"§ 18D-500. Sales to persons under the age of 21.
If any person shall sell, aid, assist, or abet any other person in selling hemp-derived
consumable products to any person under the age of 21 years, or if any person shall purchase
hemp-derived consumable products on behalf of a person under the age of 21 years, the person
shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor; provided, however, that it shall not be unlawful to sell
hemp-derived consumable products to an employee or agent of a permittee under the age of 21
years when possession of the hemp-derived consumable product is required pursuant to a permit
in the performance of that person's duties of employment or contract.
"§ 18D-501. Purchase by persons under the age of 21.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, if any person under the age of 21
years purchases or accepts receipt, or attempts to purchase or accept receipt, of hemp-derived
consumable products, the person shall commit an infraction. The person shall not be required to
pay any fine or court costs.
(b) If a person under the age of 21 presents or offers to any person any purported proof
of age which is false, fraudulent, or not actually his or her own, for the purpose of purchasing or
receiving any hemp-derived consumable product, the person shall be guilty of a Class 2
misdemeanor.
(c) It shall not be unlawful for an employee or agent of a permittee under the age of 21
years to accept receipt of, sell, transport, possess, or dispense hemp-derived consumable products
when required pursuant to a permit in the performance of that person's duties of employment or
contract, if the employment of the person for that purpose is lawful under applicable youth
employment statutes and Commission rules.
"§ 18D-502. Aiding or abetting a person under the age of 21 to purchase or receive
hemp-derived consumable products.
(a) If any person less than 21 years of age shall send a person less than 21 years of age to
purchase, acquire, receive, or attempt to purchase, acquire, or receive hemp-derived consumable
products or if any person less than 21 years of age shall aid or abet a person who is less than 21
years of age in purchasing, acquiring, or receiving or attempting to purchase, acquire, or receive
hemp-derived consumable products, the person shall commit an infraction. The person shall not
be required to pay any fine or court costs.
(b) If any person 21 years of age or older shall send a person less than 21 years of age to
purchase, acquire, receive, or attempt to purchase, acquire, or receive hemp-derived consumable
products, or if any person 21 years of age or older shall aid or abet a person who is less than 21
years of age in purchasing, acquiring, or receiving or attempting to purchase, acquire, or receive
hemp-derived consumable products, the person shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
"§ 18D-503. Exceptions to violations of G.S. 18D-501 and G.S. 18D-502.
Notwithstanding G.S. 18D-501 and G.S. 18D-502, a person under the age of 21 may lawfully
be enlisted by any of the following:
(1) Law enforcement, including the Division of Alcohol Law Enforcement, to test
compliance if the testing is under the direct supervision of that law
enforcement department and written parental consent is provided.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services, pursuant to a written plan
prepared by the Secretary of Health and Human Services, to use persons under
21 years of age in annual, random, unannounced inspections, provided that
prior written parental consent is given for the involvement of these persons
and that the inspections are conducted for the sole purpose of preparing a
scientifically and methodologically valid statistical study of the extent of
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
success the State has achieved in reducing the availability of hemp-derived
consumable products to persons under the age of 21, and preparing any report
to the extent required by section 1926 of the federal Public Health Service Act
(42 U.S.C. § 300x-26).
(3) A research program affiliated with an accredited community college, college,
or university located in this State to test compliance as part of a scientific
research study to further efforts in underage hemp-derived consumable
product use prevention, provided that prior written parental consent is given
for persons under 18 years of age. The scientific research study must be
approved by an institutional review board with jurisdiction to review the study
and must comply with 45 C.F.R. § 46. The ALE Division and the Department
of Health and Human Services shall be provided a copy of the study protocol
30 calendar days before it is presented to the institutional review board and
given an opportunity to provide comments regarding the proposed research
protocol to the research investigators. The research investigators shall provide
any comments received from the ALE Division and the Department of Health
and Human Services to the institutional review board for review prior to the
rendering of a decision on the scientific research study application. A person
shall not be guilty of a violation of this Article when the act in question arises
as part of a test of compliance in a scientific research study pursuant to this
subdivision. A permittee shall not be in violation of this Article or subject to
any administrative penalty when the act in question arises as part of a test of
compliance in a scientific research study pursuant to this subdivision.
"§ 18D-504. Defense to underage sale.
It shall be a defense to a violation of G.S. 18D-500 if the seller does any of the following:
(1) Shows that the purchaser produced a drivers license, a special identification
card issued under G.S. 20-37.7 or issued by the state agency of any other state
authorized to issue similar official state special identification cards for that
state, a military identification card, or a passport, showing the person's age to
be at least the required age for purchase and bearing a physical description of
the person named on the card reasonably describing the purchaser.
(2) Produces evidence of other facts that reasonably indicated at the time of sale
that the purchaser was at least the required age.
(3) Shows that at the time of purchase, the purchaser utilized a biometric
identification system that demonstrated (i) the purchaser's age to be at least
the required age for the purchase and (ii) the purchaser had previously
registered with the seller or seller's agent a drivers license, a special
identification card issued under G.S. 20-37.7 or issued by the state agency of
any other state authorized to issue similar official state special identification
cards for that state, a military identification card, or a passport showing the
purchaser's date of birth and bearing a physical description of the person
named on the document.
"§ 18D-505. Deferred prosecution or conditional discharge.
Notwithstanding G.S. 15A-1341(a1) or G.S. 15A-1341(a4), any person charged with a
misdemeanor under this Article shall be qualified for deferred prosecution or a conditional
discharge pursuant to Article 82 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes provided the defendant
has not previously been placed on probation for a violation of this Article and so states under
oath.
"Article 6.
"Miscellaneous.
"§ 18D-600. Restitution.
Page 16 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
When a person is convicted of a violation of the hemp-derived consumable product retail
sales laws, the court may order the person to make restitution to any law enforcement agency for
reasonable expenditures made in purchasing hemp-derived consumable products from the person
or the person's agent as part of an investigation leading to the person's conviction.
"§ 18D-601. Criminal penalty.
Unless a different punishment is otherwise expressly stated, any person who violates any
provisions of this Chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. In addition, the court may
impose the provisions of G.S. 18D-201, 18D-202, and 18D-600."
SECTION 2. G.S. 18B-500(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Subject Matter Jurisdiction. – After taking the oath prescribed for a peace officer, an
alcohol law-enforcement agent shall have authority to arrest and take other investigatory and
enforcement actions for any criminal offense:
(1) Occurring, encountered, or otherwise discovered on the premises of, or
elsewhere when the conduct relates to, a location under application for or
holding a permit issued by the North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control
Commission or the North Carolina Education Lottery Commission.
(1a) Occurring, encountered, or otherwise discovered on the premises of, or
elsewhere when the conduct relates to, a location holding a permit issued
pursuant to Chapter 18D of the General Statutes.
(2) Encountered or otherwise discovered while investigating or enforcing matters
for the North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission or the North
Carolina Education Lottery Commission or encountered or otherwise
discovered while investigating or enforcing the provisions of this Chapter,
Chapter 18C of the General Statutes, Chapter 18D of the General Statutes,
Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, G.S. 14-313, or Parts 1 and 2
of Article 37 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes.
(3) Encountered or otherwise discovered while carrying out any duty or function
assigned to the Division by law.
(4) Occurring in an agent's presence.
(5) When assisting another law enforcement agency."
SECTION 3. G.S. 15A-145 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-145. Expunction of records for first offenders under the age of 18 at the time of
conviction of misdemeanor; expunction of certain other misdemeanors.
(a) Whenever any person who has not previously been convicted of any felony, or
misdemeanor other than a traffic violation, under the laws of the United States, the laws of this
State or any other state, (i) pleads guilty to or is guilty of a misdemeanor other than a traffic
violation, and the offense was committed before the person attained the age of 18 years, or (ii)
pleads guilty to or is guilty of a misdemeanor possession of alcohol pursuant to
G.S. 18B-302(b)(1), or the offense of the sale of a hemp-derived consumable product to a person
under the age of 21 years pursuant to G.S. 18D-500, and the offense was committed before the
person attained the age of 21 years, he the person may file a petition in the court of the county
where he the person was convicted for expunction of the misdemeanor from his the person's
criminal record. The petition cannot be filed earlier than: (i) two years after the date of the
conviction, or (ii) the completion of any period of probation, whichever occurs later, and the
petition shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) An affidavit by the petitioner that he the petitioner has been of good behavior
for the two-year period since the date of conviction of the misdemeanor in
question and has not been convicted of any felony, or misdemeanor other than
a traffic violation, under the laws of the United States or the laws of this State
or any other state.
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Verified affidavits of two persons who are not related to the petitioner or to
each other by blood or marriage, that they know the character and reputation
of the petitioner in the community in which he the petitioner lives and that his
the petitioner's character and reputation are good.
(3) A statement that the petition is a motion in the cause in the case wherein the
petitioner was convicted.
(4) Repealed by Session Laws 2010-174, s. 2, effective October 1, 2010, and
applicable to petitions for expunctions filed on or after that date.
(4a) An application on a form approved by the Administrative Office of the Courts
requesting and authorizing a name-based State and national criminal record
check by the State Bureau of Investigation using any information required by
the Administrative Office of the Courts to identify the individual and a search
of the confidential record of expunctions maintained by the Administrative
Office of the Courts. The application shall be filed with the clerk of superior
court. The clerk of superior court shall forward the application to the State
Bureau of Investigation and to the Administrative Office of the Courts, which
shall conduct the searches and report their findings to the court.
(5) An affidavit by the petitioner that no restitution orders or civil judgments
representing amounts ordered for restitution entered against him the petitioner
are outstanding.
The petition shall be served upon the district attorney of the court wherein the case was tried
resulting in conviction. The district attorney shall have 10 days thereafter in which to file any
objection thereto and shall be duly notified as to the date of the hearing of the petition.
The judge to whom the petition is presented is authorized to call upon a probation officer for
any additional investigation or verification of the petitioner's conduct during the two-year period
that he the judge deems desirable.
…
(b) If the court, after hearing, finds that the petitioner had remained of good behavior and
been free of conviction of any felony or misdemeanor, other than a traffic violation, for two years
from the date of conviction of the misdemeanor in question, the petitioner has no outstanding
restitution orders or civil judgments representing amounts ordered for restitution entered against
him, and (i) petitioner was not 18 years old at the time of the offense in question, or (ii) petitioner
was not 21 years old at the time of the offense of possession of alcohol pursuant to
G.S. 18B-302(b)(1), or the offense of the sale of a hemp-derived consumable product to a person
under the age of 21 years pursuant to G.S. 18D-500, it shall order that such person the petitioner
be restored, in the contemplation of the law, to the status he the petitioner occupied before such
arrest or indictment or information.
(b1) No person as to whom such order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any
provision of any laws to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving a false statement by reason of
his the person's failure to recite or acknowledge such arrest, or indictment, information, or trial,
or response to any inquiry made of him the person for any purpose. This subsection shall not
apply to a sentencing hearing when the person has been convicted of a subsequent criminal
offense.
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 15A-150(a)(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) Persons granted a dismissal upon completion of a conditional discharge under
G.S. 14-50.29, 14-204, 14-277.8, 14-313(f), 15A-1341(a4), 18D-505, 90-96,
or 90-113.14."
SECTION 5. G.S. 18B-203(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-203. Powers and duties of the Commission.
(a) Powers. – The Commission shall have authority to:to do all of the following:
Page 18 House Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Administer the ABC laws;laws.
(2) Provide for enforcement of the ABC laws, in conjunction with the ALE
Division;Division.
(2a) Provide for the enforcement of the hemp-derived consumable product retail
sales laws as set forth in Chapter 18D of the General Statutes, in conjunction
with the ALE Division.
(3) Set the prices of alcoholic beverages sold in local ABC stores as provided in
Article 8;8.
(4) Require reports and audits from local boards as provided in
G.S. 18B-205;G.S. 18B-205.
(5) Determine what brands of alcoholic beverages may be sold in this State;State.
(6) Contract for State ABC warehousing, as provided in
G.S. 18B-204;G.S. 18B-204.
(7) Dispose of damaged alcoholic beverages, as provided in
G.S. 18B-806;G.S. 18B-806.
(8) Remove for cause any member or employee of a local board;board.
(9) Supervise or disapprove purchasing by any local board and inspect all records
of purchases by local boards;boards.
(10) Approve or disapprove rules adopted by any local board;board.
(11) Approve or disapprove the opening and location of ABC stores, as provided
in Article 8;8.
(12) Issue ABC permits, and impose sanctions against permittees;permittees.
(12a) Issue permits and impose sanctions against permittees as set forth in Chapter
18D of the General Statutes.
(13) Provide for the testing of alcoholic beverages, as provided in
G.S. 18B-206;G.S. 18B-206.
(14) Fix the amount of bailment charges and bailment surcharges to be assessed on
liquor shipped from a Commission warehouse;warehouse.
(15) Collect bailment charges and bailment surcharges from local boards;boards.
(16) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, enter into contracts for design and
construction of a warehouse or warehouses and supervise work and materials
used in the construction, as provided in G.S. 18B-204;G.S. 18B-204.
…
(18) Provide for the distribution and posting of warning signs to local ABC boards
regarding the dangers of alcohol consumption during pregnancy as required
under G.S. 18B-808;G.S. 18B-808.
…."
SECTION 6. Article 9 of Chapter 18B of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 18B-908. ABC permits and hemp-derived consumable product sales permits.
(a) Applications for permits under this Chapter may be filed simultaneously or in
conjunction with applications for permits under Chapter 18D of the General Statutes and may be
combined by the Commission in a single application.
(b) The Commission may use, rely upon, or incorporate by reference any information an
applicant for a permit under this Chapter has submitted in conjunction with a permit issued
pursuant to Chapter 18D of the General Statutes."
SECTION 7. Effective March 1, 2026, the ABC Commission may issue permits as
authorized by Section 1 of this act effective for the period of May 1, 2026, through April 30,
2027.
House Bill 680-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 8. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 9. This act becomes effective upon appropriation by the General
Assembly of funds for the implementation of this act. G.S. 18D-100, 18D-101, 18D-104,
18D-300 through 18D-302, and 18D-304 through 18D-307, as enacted by Section 1 of this act,
apply to permits effective on or after May 1, 2026. The remainder of Sections 1 through 6 of this
act applies to offenses committed on or after May 1, 2026.
Page 20 House Bill 680-First Edition